Wisconsin, session 2025, AB406.
do enact as follows:AB406,14Section 1. 36.11 (57) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB406,2,3536.11 (57) (c) Notwithstanding s. 36.27 (1), and subject to s. 36.27 (1m), the 1board may not approve an increase in the allocable portion of segregated fees at any 2institution until the joint committee on finance has approved the board’s revised 3policies in the manner provided in par. (b).AB406,24Section 2. 36.27 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB406,2,11536.27 (1) (a) Subject to par. (b) and sub. (1m), the board may establish for 6different classes of students differing tuition and fees incidental to enrollment in 7educational programs or use of facilities in the system. Except as otherwise 8provided in this section, the board may charge any student who is not exempted by 9this section a nonresident tuition. The board may establish special rates of tuition 10and fees for the extension and summer sessions and such other studies or courses of 11instruction as the board deems advisable.AB406,312Section 3. 36.27 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:AB406,2,131336.27 (1m) Resident undergraduate tuition. (a) In this subsection:AB406,2,15141. “Consumer price index” means the consumer price index for all urban 15consumers, U.S. city average, as determined by the U.S. department of labor.AB406,2,16162. “Resident undergraduate tuition” includes:AB406,2,1717a. Academic fees charged to a resident undergraduate student.AB406,2,1818b. Any differential tuition charged to a resident undergraduate student.AB406,2,2019c. Any other mandatory fees charged to a resident undergraduate student that 20are in addition to instructional fees.AB406,2,2321(b) The Board of Regents may not increase resident undergraduate tuition by 22more than the percentage increase in the consumer price index for the previous 23year.AB406,41Section 4. Initial applicability.AB406,3,32(1) This act first applies to the tuition and fees charged for the first semester 3or session beginning at least 30 days after the effective date of this subsection.AB406,3,44